Washington statutes.
RCW 10.37.170

Statute, private—Description.

In pleading a private statute, or right derived therefrom, it is sufficient to refer, in the indictment or information, to the statute by its title and the day of its passage, and the court must thereupon take judicial notice thereof.

[ 1891 c 28 s 33; Code 1881 s 1018; 1873 p 227 s 201; 1869 p 243 s 196; 1854 p 112 s 66; RRS s 2069.]